California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(f) The governing instruments for the time-share plan shall provide for reimbursement by the association for transportation expenses incurred and reasonable per diem payments to governing body members for attendance at regular and special meetings of the governing body.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11272.

(a) The following information concerning the time-share plan shall be made available to all time-share interest owners in the time-share plan:

(1) A proposed budget for each fiscal year consisting of the information required by Section 11240 shall be distributed not less than 15 days prior to the beginning of the fiscal year to which the budget applies.

(2) An audit of the financial statements of the association by an independent certified public accountant shall be performed each year and shall be made available upon request by a time-share owner 120 days after the close of the fiscal year. The audited financial statements shall be included in a report that includes all of the following:

(A) A balance sheet as of the end of the fiscal year.

(B) An operating (income) statement for the fiscal year.

(C) A statement of the net changes in the financial position of the time-share plan during the fiscal year.

(D) For any fiscal year in which the gross income to the association exceeds seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000), a copy of the review of the annual report prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

(E) A list of the names and methods of contacting the members of the governing body of the association.

(3) A list of the orders of business to be considered at the annual meeting of members of the association shall be distributed not less than 14 days prior to the meeting date. This list shall include the name, address, and a brief biographical sketch if available of each member of the association who is a candidate for election to the governing body.

(b) In lieu of the distribution of the budget and report required by subdivision (a), the governing body may elect to distribute a summary of the budget and report to all time-share interest owners along with a written notice that the budget and report is available at the business office of the association or at another suitable location within the boundaries of the development, and that copies will be provided upon request and at the expense of the association. If any time-share interest owner requests that a copy of the budget and report required by subdivision (a) be provided to the time-share interest owner, the association shall provide the copy to the time-share interest owner by facsimile, electronic mail, or first-class United States mail at the expense of the association and delivered within 10 days. The written notice that is distributed to each of the time-share interest owners shall be in conspicuous 14-point type on the front page of the summary of the budget and report.

(c) Delivery of the information specified in subdivision (a) may be combined where appropriate.

(d) For single site time-share plans and component sites of a multisite time-share plan located outside of the state, the association shall be subject to the provisions set forth in this section. The association must be in compliance with the applicable laws of the state or jurisdiction in which the time-share property or component site is located, and if a conflict exists between laws of the situs state and the requirements set forth in this section, the law of the situs state shall control. If the association provides for the dissemination of information provided for in this section, the association shall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this section and neither the developer nor the association shall be required to make revisions to the time-share instruments or budget in order to comply with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11273.

(a) The books of account, minutes of members and governing body meetings, and all other records of the time-share plan maintained by the association or the managing entity shall be made available for inspection and copying by any member, or by his or her duly appointed representative, at any reasonable time for a purpose reasonably related to membership in the association.

(b) The records shall be made available for inspection at the office where the records are maintained. Upon receipt of an authenticated written request from a member along with the fee prescribed by the governing body to defray the costs of reproduction, the managing entity or other custodian of records of the association or the time-share plan shall prepare and transmit to the member a copy of any and all records requested.

(c) The governing body shall establish reasonable rules with respect to all of the following:

(1) Notice to be given to the managing entity or other custodian of the records by the member desiring to make the inspection or to obtain copies.

(2) Hours and days of the week when a personal inspection of the records may be made.

(3) Payment of the cost of reproducing copies of records requested by a member.

(d) Every governing body member shall have the absolute right at any time to inspect all books, records, and documents of the association and all real and personal properties owned and controlled by the association.

(e) The association shall maintain among its records a complete list of the names and addresses of all owners of time-share interests in the time-share plan. The association shall update this list no less frequently than every six months. Unless otherwise provided in the time-share instruments, the association may not publish this owner’s list or provide a copy of it to any time-share interest owner or to any third party or use or sell the list for commercial purposes.

(f) For single site time-share plans and component sites of a multisite time-share plan located outside of the state, the association shall be subject to the provisions set forth in this section. The association must be in compliance with the applicable laws of the state or jurisdiction in which the time-share property or component site is located, and if a conflict exists between laws of the situs state and the requirements set forth in this section, the law of the situs state shall control. If the association and the time-share instruments provide for the matters contained in this section, the association shall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this section and neither the developer nor the association shall be required to make revisions to the time-share instruments in order to comply with the section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11274.

(a) The association shall not be authorized to cause the absolute forfeiture of a time-share interest owner’s right, title, or interest in the time-share plan on account of the time-share interest owner’s failure to comply with provisions of the time-share instrument or the rules and regulations for the time-share plan except pursuant to either of the following:

(1) The judgment of a court or the decision of an arbitrator as provided in the time-share instrument.

(2) A foreclosure or sale under a power of sale for the failure of a time-share interest owner to pay assessments duly levied by the association.

(b) The time-share instrument may authorize the governing body of the association, or the managing entity acting on behalf of the governing body, to suspend a time-share interest owner’s right to the occupancy of an accommodation, and all related rights and privileges as a time-share interest owner of a time-share interest in the time-share plan, during the period of time that the time-share interest owner is delinquent in the payment of regular or special assessments or other charges duly levied by the association. The time-share interest owner shall be given written notice of the suspension of his or her rights and privileges immediately after the decision to suspend has been made.

(c) The time-share instrument may authorize the association to impose a monetary penalty to suspend a time-share interest owner’s right to use an accommodation or other facility that is part of the time-share plan or to take other disciplinary action that is appropriate, short of the forfeiture of the time-share interest owner’s right, title, and interest in the time-share plan, for violations of the provisions of the time-share instrument and of the rules and regulations for operation of the time-share plan by the time-share interest owner, his or her guests or persons under his or her control, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Failure to vacate an accommodation upon expiration of the time-share interest owner’s use period.

(2) Damage to an accommodation or any other real or personal property that is part of the time-share plan.

(3) Permitting a time-share interest to be subject to a lien, other than the lien of nondelinquent real property taxes or assessments, claim, or charge that could result in the sale of time-share interests of other time-share interest owners.

(4) Creating a disturbance that interferes with the use and enjoyment of facilities of the time-share plan by other time-share interest owners.

(d) Before disciplinary action authorized under subdivision (c) can be imposed by the association, the time-share interest owner against whom the action is proposed to be taken shall be given 30-days prior written notice and the opportunity to present a written or oral defense to the charges.

(1) The governing body of the association shall decide whether the time-share interest owner’s defense shall be oral or written.

(2) The time-share interest owner shall be notified of the decision of the governing body of the association before disciplinary action is taken.

(e) The association may delegate to the managing entity, the power and authority to carry out disciplinary actions duly imposed by the governing body.

(f) For single site time-share plans and component sites of specific time-share interest multisite time-share plans and nonspecific time-share interest multisite time-share plans located outside this state, and offered for sale in this state, the public report shall contain the following disclosure in conspicuous 14-point type:
THIS TIME SHARE PLAN MAY NOT BE SUBJECT TO THE SAME PROTECTIONS AGAINST FORFEITURE AND FORECLOSURE AS PROVIDED BY CALIFORNIA LAW. YOU SHOULD BECOME FAMILIAR WITH THE PROCEDURES PROVIDED BY THE LAWS OF THE STATE IN WHICH THE TIME-SHARE PLAN IS LOCATED.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11275.

(a) Any contractual provision or other provision in the time-share instruments implemented after July 1, 2005, setting forth terms, conditions, and procedures for resolution of a dispute or claim between a time-share interest owner and a developer, or any provision in the time-share instruments implemented after July 1, 2005, setting forth terms, conditions, and procedures for resolution of a dispute of a claim between an association and the developer, shall, at a minimum, provide that the dispute or claim resolution process, proceeding, hearing, or trial be conducted in accordance with the following rules:

(1) For the developer to advance the fees necessary to initiate the dispute or claim resolution process, with the costs and fees, including ongoing costs and fees, if any, to be paid as agreed by the parties and if they cannot agree then the costs and fees are to be paid as determined by the person or persons presiding at the dispute or claim resolution proceeding or hearing.

(2) For a neutral or impartial person to administer and preside over the claim or dispute resolution process.

(3) For the appointment or selection, as designation, or assignment of the person to administer and preside over the claim or dispute resolution process within a specific period of time, which in no event shall be more than 60 days from initiation of the claim or dispute resolution process or hearing. The person appointed, selected, designated, or assigned to preside may be challenged for bias.

(4) For the venue of the claim or dispute resolution process to be in the county where the time-share is located unless the parties agree to some other location.

(5) For the prompt and timely commencement of the claim or dispute resolution process. When the contract provisions provide for a specific type of claim or dispute resolution process, the process shall be deemed to be promptly and timely commenced if it is to be commenced in accordance with the rules applicable to that process. If the rules do not specify a date by which the proceeding or hearing is required to commence, then commencement shall be by a date agreed upon by the parties, and if they cannot agree, a date shall be determined by the person presiding over the dispute resolution process.

(6) For the claim or dispute resolution process to be conducted in accordance with rules and procedures that are reasonable and fair to the parties.

(7) For the prompt and timely conclusion of the claim or dispute resolution process, including the issuance of any decision or ruling following the proceeding or hearing.

(8) For the person presiding at the claim or dispute resolution process to be authorized to provide all recognized remedies available in law or equity for any cause of action that is the basis of the proceeding or hearing. The parties may authorize the limitation or prohibition of punitive damages.

(b) A copy of the rules applicable to the claim or dispute resolution process shall be submitted as part of the application for a public report.

(c) If the claim or dispute resolution process provides or allows for a judicial remedy in accordance with the laws of this state, it shall be presumed that the proceeding or hearing satisfies the provisions of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 429, Sec. 11.   Effective September 22, 2006.   Operative January 1, 2007, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Powers, Investigation, and Enforcement [11280. - 11288.]

11280.

(a) Except as specifically provided in this section, the regulation of time-share plans and exchange programs is an exclusive power and function of the state. A unit of local government may not regulate time-share plans or exchange programs.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no provision of this chapter invalidates or modifies any provision of any zoning, subdivision, or building code or other real estate use law, ordinance, or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11281.

The commissioner may adopt, repeal, or amend forms and regulations that are necessary to effectuate the intent of the Legislature in carrying out this chapter. These forms and regulations and any order, permit, decision, demand, or requirement issued by the commissioner shall be in writing and adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11282.

The commissioner may investigate the actions or qualifications of any person or persons holding or claiming to hold a public report under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11283.

(a) Whenever the commissioner determines from available evidence that a person has done any of the following, the commissioner may order the person to desist and refrain from those acts and omissions or from the further sale or lease of interests in the time-share plan until the condition has been corrected:

(1) The person has violated or caused the violation of any provision of this chapter or the regulations pertaining thereto.

(2) The person has violated or caused a violation of Section 17537, 17537.1, 17537.2, or 17539.1, in advertising or promoting the sale of time-share interests.

(3) The person has failed to fulfill representations or assurances with respect to the time-share plan or the time-share offering upon which the department relied in issuing a public report.

(4) The person has failed to inform the department of material changes that have occurred in the time-share or time-share offering that have caused the public report to be misleading or inaccurate or which would have caused the department to deny a public report if the conditions had existed at the time of issuance.

(b) Upon receipt of such an order, the person or persons to whom the order is directed shall immediately discontinue activities in accordance with the terms of the order.

(c) Any person to whom the order is directed may, within 30 days after service thereof upon him or her, file with the commissioner a written request for hearing to contest the order. The commissioner shall, after receipt of a request for hearing, assign the matter to the Office of Administrative Hearings to conduct a hearing for findings of fact and determinations of the issues set forth in the order. If the hearing is not commenced within 15 days after receipt of the request for hearing, or on the date to which continued with the agreement of the person requesting the hearing, or if the decision of the commissioner is not rendered within 30 days after completion of the hearing, the order shall be deemed to be vacated.

(d) Service and proof of service of an order issued by the commissioner pursuant to this section may be made in a manner and upon those persons as prescribed for the service of summons in Article 3 (commencing with Section 415.10), Article 4 (commencing with Section 416.10), and Article 5 (commencing with Section 417.10) of Chapter 4 of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11284.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the commissioner may negotiate agreements with registrants and applicants resulting in disciplinary consent orders. The consent order may provide for any form of discipline provided for in this chapter. The consent order shall provide that it is not entered into as a result of any coercion by the commissioner. The consent order shall be accepted by signature or rejected by the commissioner in a timely manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11285.

An action for damages or for injunctive or declaratory relief for a violation of this chapter may be brought by any time-share interest owner or association against the developer, seller, or marketer of time-share interests, an escrow agent, or the managing entity. Relief under this section does not exclude other remedies provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative July 1, 2005, pursuant to Section 11288.)
-------------------------------------------

11286.

(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to make, issue, publish, deliver, or transfer as true and genuine any public report that is forged, altered, false, or counterfeit, knowing it to be forged, altered, false, or counterfeit or to cause to be made or participate in the making, issuance, delivery, transfer, or publication of a public report with knowledge that it is forged, altered, false, or counterfeit.

(b) Any person who violates subdivision (a) is guilty of a public offense punishable by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or
 by both the fine and imprisonment.

(c) The penalty provided by this section is not an exclusive penalty, and does not affect any other penalty, relief, or remedy provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 23.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

11287.

Any person who violates Section 11226, 11227, 11234, 11244, 11245, or 11283, is guilty of a public offense punishable by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 24.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

11288.

This chapter shall take effect on July 1, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 697, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date for Chapter 2, commencing with Section 11210.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. LICENSING AND CERTIFICATION OF REAL ESTATE APPRAISERS [11300. - 11425.]

11300.

This part may be cited as the Real Estate Appraisers’ Licensing and Certification Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 491, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11301.

(a) There is hereby created within the Department of Consumer Affairs a Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers to administer and enforce this part.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the bureau, as set forth in this part, shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this part were scheduled to be repealed as of January 1, 2030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 32.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [11302. - 11302.]

11302.

For the purpose of applying this part, the following terms, unless otherwise expressly indicated, shall mean and have the following definitions:

(a) “Affiliate” means any entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another entity.

(b) “Appraisal” means the act or process of developing an opinion of value for real property.

The term “appraisal” does not include an opinion given by a real estate licensee or engineer or land surveyor in the ordinary course of the person’s business in connection with a function for which a license is required under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section
 6700) or Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) of Division 3, or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10130) or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10500) of Part 1 and the opinion shall not be referred to as an appraisal. This part does not apply to a probate referee acting pursuant to Sections 400 to 408, inclusive, of the Probate Code unless the appraised transaction is federally related.

(c) “Appraisal Foundation” means the Appraisal Foundation that was incorporated as an Illinois not-for-profit corporation on November 30, 1987.

(d) (1) “Appraisal management company” means any person or entity that satisfies all of the following conditions:

(A) Provides appraisal management services to creditors
 or to secondary mortgage market participants, including affiliates.

(B) Provides those services in connection with valuing a consumer’s principal dwelling as security for a consumer credit transaction or incorporating those transactions into securitizations.

(C) Within a given 12 calendar month period oversees an appraiser panel of more than 15 state-certified or state-licensed appraisers in a state or 25 or more state-certified or state-licensed appraisers in two or more states, as described in Section 11345.5.

(2) An appraisal management company does not include a department or division of an entity that provides appraisal management services only to that entity.

(3) An appraisal management company that is a subsidiary of an insured depository institution and regulated by a federal financial institution is not required to register with the bureau.

(e) “Appraisal management services” means one or more of the following:

(1) Recruiting, selecting, and retaining appraisers.

(2) Contracting with state-certified or state-licensed appraisers to perform appraisal assignments.

(3) Managing the process of having an appraisal performed,
 including providing administrative services such as receiving appraisal orders and appraisal reports, submitting completed appraisal reports to creditors and secondary market participants, collecting fees from creditors and secondary market participants for services provided, and paying appraisers for services performed.

(4) Reviewing and verifying the work of appraisers.

(f) “Appraiser panel” means a network, list, or roster of licensed or certified appraisers approved by an appraisal management company to perform appraisals as independent contractors for the appraisal management company. Appraisers on an appraisal management company’s “appraiser panel” under this part include both appraisers accepted by the appraisal management company for consideration for future
 appraisal assignments in covered transactions or for secondary mortgage market participants in connection with covered transactions, and appraisers engaged by the appraisal management company to perform one or more appraisals in covered transactions or for secondary mortgage market participants in connection with covered transactions. An appraiser is an independent contractor for purposes of this part if the appraiser is treated as an independent contractor by the appraisal management company for purposes of federal income taxation.

(g) “Appraisal Subcommittee” means the Appraisal Subcommittee of the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council.

(h) “Bureau” means the Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers.

(i) “Consumer
 credit” means credit offered or extended to a consumer primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(j) “Controlling person” means one or more of the following:

(1) An officer or director of an appraisal management company, or an individual who holds a 10 percent or greater ownership interest in an appraisal management company.

(2) An individual employed, appointed, or authorized by an appraisal management company that has the authority to enter into a contractual relationship with clients for the performance of appraisal services and that has the authority to enter into agreements with independent appraisers for the completion of appraisals.

(3) An
 individual who possesses the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of an appraisal management company.

(k) “Course provider” means a person or entity that provides educational courses related to professional appraisal practice.

(l) “Covered transaction” means any consumer credit transaction secured by the consumer’s principal dwelling.

(m) “Creditor” means:

(1) A person who regularly extends consumer credit that is subject to a finance charge or is payable by written agreement in more than four installments, not including a down payment, and to whom the obligation is initially payable, either on the face of the note or contract,
 or by agreement when there is no note or contract.

(2) A person regularly extends consumer credit if, in any 12-month period, the person originates more than one credit extension for transactions secured by a dwelling.

(n) “Department” means the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(o) “Director” or “chief” means the Chief of the Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers.

(p) “Dwelling” means:

(1) A residential structure that contains one to four units, whether or not that structure is attached to real property. The term includes an individual condominium unit, cooperative unit, mobilehome, and trailer,
 if it is used as a residence.

(2) A consumer can have only one “principal” dwelling at a time. Thus, a vacation or other second home is not a principal dwelling. However, if a consumer buys or builds a new dwelling
 that will become the consumer’s principal dwelling within a year or upon the completion of construction, the new dwelling is considered the principal dwelling for purposes of this section.

(q) “Federal financial institutions regulatory agency” means the Federal Reserve Board, Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, Federal Home Loan Bank System, National Credit Union Administration, and any other agency determined by the director to have jurisdiction over transactions subject to this part.

(r) “Federally regulated appraisal management company” means an appraisal management company that is owned and controlled by an insured depository institution, as defined in Section 1813 of Title 12 of the United States Code and regulated by
 the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(s) “Federally related real estate appraisal activity” means the act or process of making or performing an appraisal on real estate or real property in a federally related transaction and preparing an appraisal as a result of that activity.

(t) “Federally related transaction” means any real estate-related financial transaction that a federal financial institutions regulatory agency engages in, contracts for or regulates and that requires the services of a state licensed real estate appraiser regulated by this part. This term also includes any transaction identified as such by a federal financial institutions regulatory agency.

(u) “License” means any license, certificate, permit, registration, or other means issued by the bureau authorizing the person to
 whom it is issued to act pursuant to this part within this state.

(v) “Licensure” means the procedures and requirements a person shall comply with in order to qualify for issuance of a license and includes the issuance of the license.

(w) “Registration” means the procedures and requirements with which a person or entity shall comply in order to qualify to conduct business as an appraisal management company.

(x) “Secondary mortgage participant” means a guarantor or insurer of mortgage-backed securities, or an underwriter or issuer of mortgage-backed securities. Secondary mortgage market participant only includes an individual investor in a mortgage-backed security if that investor also serves in the capacity of
 a guarantor, insurer, underwriter, or issuer for the mortgage-backed security.

(y) “State licensed real estate appraiser” is a person who is issued and holds a current valid license under this part.

(z) “Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice” are the standards of professional appraisal practice established by the Appraisal Foundation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 38.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Administration [11310. - 11319.2.]

11310.

The Governor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the Senate, the Chief of the Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers who shall, in consultation with the Governor and the Director of Consumer Affairs, administer the licensing and certification program for real estate appraisers. In making the appointment, consideration shall be given to the qualifications of an individual that demonstrate knowledge of the real estate appraisal profession.

(a) The chief shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The salary for the chief shall be fixed and determined by the Director of Consumer Affairs with approval of the Department of Human Resources.

(b) The chief shall not be actively engaged in the appraisal business or any other affected industry for the term of appointment, and thereafter the chief shall be subject to Section 87406 of the Government Code.

(c) The chief, in consultation with the Director of Consumer Affairs and in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, may appoint and fix the compensation of legal, clerical, technical, investigation, and auditing personnel as may be necessary to carry out this part. All personnel shall perform their respective duties under the supervision and direction of the chief.

(d) The chief may appoint not more than four deputies as he or she deems appropriate. The deputies shall perform their respective duties under the supervision and direction of the chief.

(e) Every power granted to or duty imposed upon the chief under this part may be exercised or performed in the name of the chief by the deputies, subject to conditions and limitations as the chief may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 43.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

11310.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 39.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11310.3.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to ensure that no one is discriminated against during the appraisal process of a real estate transaction. 

(b) The bureau, on its existing complaint form, shall create a check box asking if the complainant believes the opinion of the value of the real estate is below the market value. The bureau shall collect demographic information regarding sellers, those seeking to refinance, buyers, or a representative authorized in real estate transactions making a complaint, including, but not limited to, their identity within a protected class as listed in the notice described in Section
 1102.6g of the Civil Code. This information shall be provided on a voluntary basis by the sellers, those seeking to refinance, the buyers, or by a representative authorized in real estate transactions. The information may include a contact telephone number, email address if available, and home address of the complainant.

(c) (1) The bureau shall compile data on the identity within a protected class of the sellers, those seeking to refinance, the buyers, or an authorized representative who believes the opinion of the value of the real estate is below the market value. The bureau complaint form shall allow the complainant to select their identity within the protected classes as follows:

(A) By using a drop-down menu,
 if on an internet website.

(B) By checking boxes, if on a paper form.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the complaint form shall be short, simple, and easy to complete. Consistent with that intent, the bureau may, at its discretion, include an option for the complainant to select “other” for any protected class for which listing every possible identity within the protected class would render the form excessively lengthy, complex, or difficult to complete.

(d) The bureau shall confirm that the complainant is the seller, someone seeking to refinance, the buyer, or a representative authorized in real estate transactions by the contact information provided in subdivision (b). An authorized representative shall provide
 a contact telephone number, email address if available, and home address of the person that provided the authorization.

(e) (1) On or before July 1, 2024, the bureau shall report to the Legislature in the aggregate the information collected and compiled pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c).

(2) A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 352, Sec. 2.   (AB 948)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11313.

The bureau is under the supervision and control of the Director of Consumer Affairs. The duty of enforcing and administering this part is vested in the chief, and the chief is responsible to the Director of Consumer Affairs therefor. The chief shall adopt and enforce rules and regulations as are determined reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this part. Those rules and regulations shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Regulations adopted by the former Director of the Bureau of Real Estate Appraisers shall continue to apply to the bureau and its licensees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 40.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11314.

The bureau is required to include in its regulations requirements for licensure and discipline of real estate appraisers that ensure protection of the public interest and comply in all respects with Title XI of the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989, Public Law 101-73 and any subsequent amendments thereto. Requirements for each level of licensure shall, at a minimum, meet the criteria established by the Appraiser Qualification Board of the Appraisal Foundation. The bureau may additionally include in its regulations requirements for the registration of appraisal management companies consistent with this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 431, Sec. 41.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11315.

(a) The director may issue to a licensee, applicant for licensure, person who acts in a capacity that requires a license under this part, course provider, applicant for course provider accreditation, or a person who, or entity that, acts in a capacity that requires course provider accreditation, a citation that may contain an order to pay an administrative fine assessed by the bureau if the person or entity is in violation of this part or any regulations adopted to carry out its purposes.

(b) A citation shall be written and describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including a specific reference to the provision of law determined to have been violated.

(c) If appropriate, the citation may contain an order of abatement fixing a reasonable time for abatement of the violation.

(d) (1) If appropriate, the citation may contain an order to enroll in and successfully complete additional basic or continuing education courses.
